Wisconsin, session 2025, AB276.
do enact as follows:AB276,11Section 1. 227.135 (1) (g) of the statutes is created to read:AB276,2,52227.135 (1) (g) A statement as to whether the statement of scope will be for a 3proposed emergency rule or for a proposed permanent rule. An agency that intends 4to concurrently promulgate an emergency rule and a permanent rule shall prepare 5separate statements of scope.AB276,26Section 2. 227.135 (5) of the statutes is renumbered 227.135 (5) (a) and 7amended to read:AB276,2,178227.135 (5) (a) A statement of scope for a proposed permanent rule shall 9expire on the date that is 30 months after the date on which it is published in the 10register. After a statement of scope for a proposed permanent rule expires, an 11agency may not submit a proposed rule based upon that statement of scope to the 12legislature for review under s. 227.19 (2), and any such rule that has not been 13submitted to the legislature for review before that date shall be considered 14withdrawn on that date as provided in s. 227.14 (6) (c) 1. a. For purposes of this 15subsection paragraph, a revised statement of scope prepared under sub. (4) for a 16proposed permanent rule shall expire on the date that is 30 months after the date 17on which the revised statement is published in the register.AB276,318Section 3. 227.135 (5) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB276,3,71227.135 (5) (b) A statement of scope for a proposed emergency rule shall 2expire on the date that is 6 months after the date on which it is published in the 3register. After a statement of scope for a proposed emergency rule expires, an 4agency may not promulgate a proposed emergency rule based upon that statement 5of scope. For purposes of this paragraph, a revised statement of scope prepared 6under sub. (4) for a proposed emergency rule shall expire on the date that is 6 7months after the date on which the revised statement is published in the register.AB276,48Section 4. 227.135 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB276,3,109227.135 (7) An agency may not promulgate more than one permanent rule or 10one emergency rule based on a statement of scope.AB276,511Section 5. 227.14 (6) (c) 1. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB276,3,1412227.14 (6) (c) 1. a. If the proposed rule is not submitted to the legislature for 13review under s. 227.19 (2) before the statement of the scope of the proposed rule 14expires as provided in s. 227.135 (5) (a), on the date that statement of scope expires.AB276,615Section 6. Initial applicability.AB276,3,1716(1) This act first applies to a statement of scope that is published in the 17Wisconsin Administrative Register on the effective date of this subsection.AB276,3,1818